Hawaii statutes.
§15-5 Delivery of ballots. (a)
Immediately upon receipt of a request for absentee ballot within the time limit
specified in section 15-4, the clerk shall examine the records to ascertain
whether the voter is lawfully entitled to vote as requested. If the clerk
ascertains that the voter is lawfully entitled to vote as requested, no earlier
than thirty days before the election, the clerk shall mail in a forwarding
envelope, or deliver in person if the voter appears at the office of the clerk,
an official ballot and other materials prescribed in section 15-6, except that
an incapacitated voter may send a representative to obtain the voter's ballots
pursuant to the rules adopted by the chief election officer; provided that
official ballots and other materials prescribed in section 15-6 shall be mailed
or delivered:

(1) To uniform military and overseas voters pursuant
to section 15D-9; and

(2) No later than twenty-four hours after receipt of
the request for absentee ballot for requests received on the last day specified
in section 15-4.

(b) If mailed absentee ballots are not
received by the voter within five days of an election, a covered voter under
chapter 15D may request that absentee ballots be forwarded by facsimile. Upon
receipt of such a request and confirmation that proper application was made,
the clerk may transmit appropriate ballots by facsimile together with a form
requiring the affirmations and information required by section 15-6, and a form
containing a waiver of the right to secrecy, as provided by section 11-137.
The voter may return the voted ballots and executed forms by facsimile or mail;
provided that they are received by the issuing clerk no later than the close of
polls on election day. Upon receipt, the clerk shall verify compliance with
the requirements of section 15-9(c), and prepare the ballots for counting
pursuant to section 15-10. [L 1975, c 36, pt of §3; am L 1980, c 248, §1(c);
gen ch 1985; am L 1993, c 304, §8; am L 2012, c 226, §2; am L 2015, c 173, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next